Oklahoma, session 2026, SB328.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Promote Child


Thriving Act”.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


The Legislature finds that:


1. Children have a primal and indelible relation to their


mother and father. It is a fundamental claim of justice that,


whenever possible, children be raised in a marital home by the two

Req. No. 1427 Page 1


persons whose union gave them life, bequeathed them their unique


identity and characteristics, and joined them to a genealogical


history of maternal and paternal kinship. It is a compelling state


interest, priority, and responsibility to honor and protect the


natural marital family context for the sake of children whose


identity and life prospects are so substantially implicated by it;


2. Accordingly, and as Justice Sotomayor summarized in her


dissenting opinion in Adoptive Couple v. Baby Girl, 570 U.S. 637,


673 (2013) (Sotomayor, J., dissenting), that the biological bond


between parent and child is meaningful, that children have an


interest in knowing their biological parents, and that the


deprivation of a child’s relationship with mother or father is a


loss that cannot be measured;


3. The natural family relationship of husband and wife and


their offspring is an aspect of human nature and community anterior


to and transcending state discretion. As the Supreme Court


acknowledged in Smith v. Org. of Foster Families for Equal & Reform,


431 U.S. 816, 845 (1977), unlike, for instance, the state-initiated


and -directed foster care relation, the natural family is “a


relationship having its origins entirely apart from the power of the


State,” therefore has its unique prerogatives founded “in intrinsic


human rights, as they have been understood in this Nation’s history


and tradition”;



Req. No. 1427 Page 2


4. Federal and state constitutional case law and historic state


family law standards accord unique deference and protection to the


marital relationship and the relation of natural mother and father


to child, and that a child’s loss of relationship with the child’s


mother or father is a lamentable outcome that venerable legal


standards aim to discourage and avoid;


5. Evidence from multiple areas of study reveals that children


who grow up apart from one or both biological parents tend, by


statistically significant margins, to fare worse and to be


substantially disadvantaged compared to cohorts of children raised


by their mother and father in a marital household. And that:


a. biological parents are statistically the safest, most


connected to, most invested in, and most protective


adults in a child’s life. Children who are raised by


both biological parents in a married relationship


suffer the lowest rates of obesity, drug use, and


incarceration. They have the highest rates of


academic success and emotional health, and are most


likely to escape or avoid poverty,


b. loss of a parent affects a child’s physical,


mental/emotional, and educational outcomes,


c. cohabitation of a child’s biological parents does not


produce the same benefit for children. Studies show


the nonmarital cohabitation relationship of a child’s

Req. No. 1427 Page 3


mother and father is not a benefit equivalent to a


home of a married father and mother, citing increased


risk of parental breakup, abuse, and poverty,


d. there are no known remedial government programs or


subsidies which can replace or compensate for the loss


to children of an upbringing in the marital home of


their mother and father, and


e. being raised outside of the home of a child’s married


biological parents tends toward multigenerational


continuation. Data reveals that children of single


mothers are more likely to have children out of


marriage, children of divorce are more likely to


themselves divorce, and children created via third-


party sperm or egg are more likely to dissociate


themselves from their genetic children via “donating”


when they reach adulthood. Failing to fortify a


child’s family leads to future broken families;


6. The clear connection between natural parental bonds and


child welfare obligates the state to incentivize homes that unite


children to both mother and father. Studies show that the best


means to achieve that end is to encourage biological parents to be


married to one another; and


7. This state’s financial incentivizing of children’s


upbringing in a home with their married mother and father will

Req. No. 1427 Page 4


minimize the need for government anti-poverty funds, child


protective services, academic support, police involvement, and other


state emergency or remedial aid.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2357.701 of Title 68, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. For tax year 2025 and subsequent tax years, there shall be


allowed a credit against the tax imposed pursuant to Section 2355 of


Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes for married mothers and fathers of


biological children in the following amounts:


1. Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) for each child under 18 years


of age and residing in the parents’ home while the child’s


biological mother and father are married to each other; and


2. One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for each child under 18


years of age if the child’s biological mother and father were


married prior to the child’s birth.


B. To qualify for the credit authorized pursuant to subsection


A of this section, the biological parents shall:


1. Be listed on the birth certificate of the dependent or be


the custodial parent during the entirety of the tax year;


2. Reside in the same household as the dependent for at least


six (6) months of the tax year, except when:


a. a biological parent is enlisted as an active duty


member of the Armed Forces of the United States and

Req. No. 1427 Page 5


deployed for at least six (6) months of the tax year,


or


b. the dependent is born during the tax year; and


3. Be married for the entirety of the tax year.


C. The credit authorized pursuant to this section shall be


claimed on a form prescribed by the Oklahoma Tax Commission and


shall include, under penalty of perjury, the following statements of


attestation:


1. That the taxpayers are legally married;


2. That the taxpayers have resided in the same household with


the child for at least six (6) months of the calendar year


corresponding to the tax year for which the credit is claimed,


unless exempted pursuant to paragraph 2 of subsection B of this


section; and


3. That the dependent is the biological child of the taxpayers.


D. The credit allowed pursuant to the provisions of this


section shall not be used to reduce the income tax liability of the


taxpayer to less than zero (0).


E. If the amount of the credit allowed pursuant to this section


exceeds the income tax liability, the amount of credit not used in


any tax year may be carried forward, in order, to each of the ten


(10) subsequent tax years.


F. Claims for credit pursuant to this section that contain


fraudulent information shall be denied, and the Tax Commission shall

Req. No. 1427 Page 6


recover any allowed credit claimed with fraudulent information and


may levy penalties in an amount not to exceed Five Hundred Dollars


($500.00).


SECTION 4. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 5. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-1427 QD 12/31/2024 12:50:04 PM





























Req. No. 1427 Page 7